California, session 20252026, AB1819.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19300 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:19300. (a) This chapter applies to all of the following structures, as defined in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 301.1) of Part 2, the California Building Code, of Title 24, the California Building Standards Code, of the California Code of Regulations, that are constructed on or after January 1, 2017, or are constructed prior to January 1, 2017, and modified, renovated, or tenant improved, as described in subdivision (b), subsequent to that date:(1) Group A assembly buildings with an occupancy of greater than 300.(2) Group B business buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more.(3) Group E educational buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more.(4) Group F factory buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more.(5) Group I institutional buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more.(6) Group M mercantile buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more.(7) Group R residential buildings with an occupancy of 200 or more, excluding single-family and multifamily dwelling units.(b) A structure shall be considered modified, renovated, or tenant improved for purposes of subdivision (a) if the structure is subject to any of the following on or after January 1, 2020:(1) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of tenant improvements in one calendar year.(2) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of building renovations in one calendar year.(3) Any tenant improvement for places of assembly, including auditoriums and performing arts and movie theaters.(c) (1) The following occupied structures shall have an automated external defibrillator (AED) on the premises subject to the requirements in Section 1797.196:(A) A structure described in subdivision (a) or (b).(B)A senior center, as defined in Section 19301, with a capacity of over 50 people, including senior centers run by a local government entity.(B) Notwithstanding the occupancy rates listed in subdivision (a), the structure is of a type described in subdivision (a), serves a population of adults 55 years of age or older, and has the capacity to serve 50 or more adults 55 years of age or older.(2) A person or entity that acquires an AED for emergency care pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions in the rendering of the emergency care by use of an AED if that person or entity has complied with subdivision (b) of Section 1797.196.(d) (1) This chapter shall not apply to a structure in subdivision (a) or (b) that is owned or operated by any local government entity.(2) This chapter shall not apply to a health facility licensed under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.(e) If there is an existing AED in the common area of the structure, the requirements of this section are met without the installation of another AED.(f) Except for structures specified in subdivision (b), this chapter shall not be construed to apply to a structure that is vacant or under construction or renovation.SEC. 2.Section 19301 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:19301.(a)A senior center shall acquire, maintain, and train personnel in the use of, an automatic external defibrillator pursuant to this section.(b)An employee or volunteer of a senior center who renders emergency care or treatment is not liable for civil damages resulting from the use, attempted use, or nonuse of an automatic external defibrillator, except as provided in subdivision (f).(c)When an employee or volunteer uses, does not use, or attempts to use an automatic external defibrillator consistent with the requirements of this section to render emergency care or treatment, the members of the board of directors of the facility shall not be liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in rendering the emergency care or treatment, including the use or nonuse of an automatic external defibrillator, except as provided in subdivision (f).(d)Except as provided in subdivisions (f) and (g), when an employee or volunteer of a senior center renders emergency care or treatment using an automatic external defibrillator, the owners, managers, employees, volunteers, or otherwise responsible authorities of the facility shall not be liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission in the course of rendering that emergency care or treatment, provided that the facility fully complies with subdivision (e).(e)Notwithstanding Section 1797.196, in order to ensure public safety, a senior center shall do all of the following:(1)Comply with all regulations governing the placement of an automatic external defibrillator.(2)Ensure all of the following:(A)The automatic external defibrillator is maintained and regularly tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines set forth by the manufacturer, the American Heart Association, or the American Red Cross, and according to any applicable rules and regulations set forth by the governmental authority under the federal Food and Drug Administration and any other applicable state and federal authority.(B)The automatic external defibrillator is checked for readiness after each use and at least once every 30 days if the automatic external defibrillator has not been used in the preceding 30 days. The senior center shall maintain records of these checks.(C)Ensure that a person who renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using an automatic external defibrillator activates the emergency medical services system as soon as possible, and reports the use of the automatic external defibrillator to the licensed physician and to the local EMS agency.(D)Ensure that for every automatic external defibrillator unit acquired, up to five units, no less than one employee or volunteer per automatic external defibrillator unit shall complete a training course in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automatic external defibrillator use that complies with the regulations adopted by the Emergency Medical Services Authority and the standards of the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross. After the first five automatic external defibrillator units are acquired, for each additional five automatic external defibrillator units acquired, a minimum of one employee or volunteer shall be trained, beginning with the first additional automatic external defibrillator unit acquired. Acquirers of automatic external defibrillator units shall have trained employees or volunteers who should be available to respond to an emergency that may involve the use of an automatic external defibrillator unit during staffed operating hours. Acquirers of automatic external defibrillator units may need to train additional employees or volunteers to ensure that a trained employee or volunteer is available at all times.(E)Ensure that there is a written plan that exists that describes the procedures to be followed in the event of an emergency that may involve the use of an automatic external defibrillator to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section. The written plan shall include, but not be limited to, immediate notification of 911 and trained office personnel at the start of automatic external defibrillator procedures.(3)A senior center that allows individuals access to its facility during times when it does not have an employee or volunteer on the premises shall do all of the following:(A)Require that all employees who work on the senior center’s premises complete a training course, within 30 days of beginning employment, in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use that complies with the regulations adopted by the Emergency Medical Services Authority and the standards of the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.(B)Ensure that a trained employee or volunteer is on the senior center’s premises for no fewer than 50 hours per week.(C)Inform an individual, at the time they contract for the use of the senior center, that a trained employee or volunteer will not be on the senior center’s premises at all times.(D)Deny access to the senior when an employee or volunteer is not present if the senior center operates in a space that is larger than 6,000 square feet.(f)Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) do not apply in the case of personal injury or wrongful death that results from gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct on the part of the person who uses, attempts to use, or maliciously fails to use an automatic external defibrillator to render emergency care or treatment.(g)A senior center that allows access to its facilities during operating hours when employees or volunteers trained in the use of automatic external defibrillators are not on the facility premises, waives the provisions of subdivision (d) and the affirmative defense of primary assumption of the risk, whether express or implied, as to a claim arising out of the absence of trained staff.(h)For purposes of this section, “senior center” means a facility that primarily serves seniors who are 55 years of age or older and is a community focal point on aging, where older individuals as individuals or in groups come together for services and activities which enhance their dignity, support their independence, and encourage their involvement in and with the community. Senior center programs consist of a variety of services and activities in areas, such as education, creative arts, recreation, advocacy, leadership development, employment, health, nutrition, social work, and other supportive services.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.